District of Columbia statutes.
4-218.06

Suspension, revocation, or denial of a business license or permit.

(a)

The Mayor is authorized to suspend, revoke, or deny the issuance or renewal of any business license or permit of any person or entity convicted of food stamp trafficking under this section, the Food Stamp Act, or regulations issued pursuant to the Food Stamp Act.

(b)

Prior to the suspension, revocation, or denial of any business license or permit, the affected party shall be given notice, and shall be offered an opportunity to present evidence, and to be heard concerning the proposed action.

(c)

In any hearing pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, a conviction shall create a presumption that the person or entity convicted of food stamp trafficking is unfit to hold the business license or permit at issue.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1806
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-254,§ 2(d), 46 DCR 1276
1981 Ed., § 3-218.6.